Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.284

Mortgage loan originator—Unique identifier—Display.

The unique identifier of any mortgage loan originator must be clearly shown on all residential mortgage loan application forms, solicitations, or advertisements, including business cards or websites, and any other documents as established by rule, regulation, or order of the director. This section does not apply to consumer loan company licensees.

[ 2009 c 120 s 29.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.